Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3026
Charter; surrendered, suspended, or revoked; effect.

If the charter of a digital asset depository is surrendered, suspended, or revoked, the digital asset depository shall continue to be subject to the provisions of the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act during any liquidation or conservatorship.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 26;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 39.